Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.170

Records of licensee—Contents.

The licensee shall keep accurate records which shall be available for inspection to all parties directly interested therein, and the records shall contain the following information:

(1) The date on which each consignment of livestock was received and sold.

(2) The name and address of the buyer and seller of the livestock.

(3) The number and species of livestock received and sold.

(4) The marks, brands, and identification on the livestock.

(5) All statements of warranty or representations of title material to, or upon which, any sale is consummated.

(6) The gross selling price of the livestock with a detailed list of all charges deducted therefrom.

These records shall be kept by the licensee for one year subsequent to the receipt of such livestock.

[ 2019 c 92 s 12; 2003 c 326 s 74; 1967 c 192 s 1; 1959 c 107 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.